Colorado statutes. TITLE 36 Natural Resources - General
ARTICLE 1 STATE BOARD OF LAND COMMISSIONERS
36-1-120.5. Land subject to development - leases.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that some of the public lands under the direction, control, and disposition of the state board of land commissioners are within the path of impending development and therefore are of unique economic value to the state for the funding of public schools. The general assembly recognizes that the state board of land commissioners needs flexibility to manage such lands so as to comply with the requirements of sections 9 and 10 of article IX of the state constitution, to prevent undue speculation by others on public lands under the control of the state board of land commissioners, and to protect the public's interest in such lands.

Any lease of public lands under the control of the state board of land commissioners when such land is subject to development shall be in accordance with the provisions of this section. For purposes of this section, "land subject to development" means land which, because of its location or other characteristics, is determined by the state board of land commissioners to be suitable for commercial, industrial, or residential uses.

The lessee of lands subject to development shall meet all federal, state, and local land use regulations, and the terms of a lease shall encourage the lessee to obtain the maximum economic recovery from the development of such lands. Local land use and other applicable local regulations shall not be applied in a discriminatory manner to public lands under the control of the state board of land commissioners.

Any local land use regulation or other local regulation to the contrary notwithstanding, the appropriation and development of water associated with public lands under the control of the state board of land commissioners shall be pursuant solely to applicable laws of the state and the federal government.

In addition to any other payments made by the lessee to the state, the lessee shall pay to all affected governmental entities an amount equal to the amount which would be owed for property taxes if the real property involved were privately owned. This amount shall be based on what the valuation for assessment of the underlying land would be if it were privately owned. These payments in lieu of taxes shall be made at the same time and in the same manner as real property taxes. If a lease commences or ends at other than the beginning of the calendar year, the payment in lieu of taxes shall be prorated for the year involved. Nothing in this section shall affect the authority of government entities to levy and collect property taxes upon privately owned improvements located upon public lands under the control of the state board of land commissioners.

Until the state board of land commissioners leases for development purposes state lands under its control, no land used for agricultural purposes, grazing, forestry, mining, oil and gas production or exploration, or other similar uses shall be considered land subject to development; except that nothing in this subsection (6) shall be construed to limit the authority of the state board of land commissioners to impose conditions upon the lease of public lands under its direction and control, subject to all other requirements of law.

Source:

L. 87:

Entire section added, p. 1291, § 1, effective May 25.

L. 97:

(1) amended, p. 841, § 16, effective May 21.

36-1-121. Trespass - penalty - bond.

Any corporation, company, or person using or occupying any state or school lands without lease, and any corporation, company, or person who shall use or occupy state or school lands for more than thirty days after the cancellation or expiration of a lease, and any corporation, company, or person who constructs a reservoir, ditch, railroad, public highway, telegraph or telephone line, or in any manner occupies or enters upon lands belonging to the state, without first having secured the authority and permission of the state board of land commissioners to so occupy the land for such purpose, shall be regarded as a trespasser and commits a civil infraction.

In each case, where a bond has been furnished to the state board of land commissioners, the surety of the lessee shall be equally liable with the lessee, and, in addition to the foregoing penalty, the state shall be allowed to collect as rental for the use of such lands a sum equal to the appraised value thereof for rental purposes, as fixed by the state board of land commissioners. All suits under the provisions of this article shall be instituted under the direction of the attorney general, in the name of the people of the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 644, § 13.

C.L.

§ 1166.

CSA:

C. 134, § 65.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-21.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-21.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 841, § 17, effective May 21.

L. 2021:

(1) amended, (SB 21-271), ch. 462, p. 3289, § 669, effective March 1, 2022.

36-1-122. Platting and sale in lots and blocks.

The state board of land commissioners may cause any portion of the state or school lands to be laid out in lots and blocks or other tracts by a recorded plat to be sold at public auction or exchanged.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 646, § 15.

C.L.

§ 1168.

CSA:

C. 134, § 67.

L. 49:

p. 533, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-23.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-23.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 842, § 18, effective May 21.

36-1-123. Purchase of necessary land by U.S. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 19:

p. 646, § 16.

C.L.

§ 1169.

CSA:

C. 134, § 68.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-24.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-24.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 842, § 19, effective May 21.

36-1-123.5. Sale or lease of state lands for federal military real property expansion.

No state lands shall be sold or leased to the United States department of defense or any other unit of federal government if such sale or lease has the purpose or effect of expanding the Piñon Canyon maneuver site.

Source:

L. 2009:

Entire section added, (HB 09-1317), ch. 381, p. 2073, § 4, effective June 2.

36-1-124. Sale of state lands.

The state board of land commissioners may at any time direct the sale of any state lands, except as provided in this article, in such parcels as the board deems proper. Except as specified in section 36-1-124.3, all sales under this article, except those to the United States, shall be advertised in four consecutive issues of a weekly paper of the county in which the land is situated, if there is a weekly paper in the county, and, if not, then in a paper published in an adjoining county and in other papers as the board may direct.

Except as specified in section 36-1-124.3, the advertisement shall state the time, place, and terms of sale and the minimum price fixed by the state board of land commissioners for each parcel, lot, block, or tract below which no bid shall be received. All patents and certificates of purchase issued before March 31, 1919, are validated. If any land is sold on which authorized improvements have been made by lessees, the improvements shall be appraised under the direction of the board. When lands on which such improvements have been made are sold, the purchasers, if other than the owner of the improvements, shall pay the appraised value of the improvements to the owner thereof, taking a receipt therefor, and such purchaser shall deposit such receipt with the board before such purchaser is entitled to a patent or certificate of purchase. All such receipts shall be filed and preserved in the office of the state board of land commissioners.

After receipt of a notice authorized by section 24-33-107 (2)(a), C.R.S., identifying lands alleged to have a unique economic or environmental value to the public, the state board of land commissioners shall not proceed with the sale of any lands identified in such notice unless such notice is withdrawn pursuant to section 24-33-107 (2)(c), C.R.S., or unless and until authorized by resolution or act of the general assembly or for two years thereafter, whichever first occurs. Thereafter, all the requirements of this article as to manner and terms of sale of state lands shall be deemed to have been met with respect to any sale of state lands made to the department of natural resources pursuant to the provisions of section 24-33-107 and article 1 of title 38, C.R.S.

After any lands are designated as being included as part of the long-term stewardship trust established in section 36-1-107.5, the state board of land commissioners shall not proceed with the sale or exchange of any lands so designated unless such lands are first removed from the trust pursuant to section 36-1-107.5.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 646, § 17.

C.L.

§ 1170.

CSA:

C. 134, § 69.

L. 49:

p. 553, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-25.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-25.

L. 65:

p. 921, § 2.

L. 67:

p. 50, § 1.

L. 73:

p. 178, § 3.

L. 97:

(1) and (2) amended and (4) added, p. 842, § 20, effective May 21.

L. 2009:

(1) amended, (SB 09-022), ch. 246, p. 1110, § 2, effective May 14.

L. 2010:

(1) and (2) amended, (HB 10-1165), ch. 124, p. 411, § 1, effective April 15.

Cross references:

For additional provisions concerning the sale of state lands, see article 5 of this title.

36-1-124.3. Acquisition of state trust lands by governmental entities.

The general assembly declares that its intent in enacting this section is to authorize the transfer of interests in land to local governments or special districts in exchange for fair and adequate consideration.

If the state board of land commissioners seeks to dispose of a parcel of land to a local government or special district, the state board shall give public notice of its intent pursuant to subsection (3) of this section. Not less than sixty days after the date of notice, the state board shall meet in public session to hear and receive testimony and evidence concerning the proposed disposal. After giving full consideration to the testimony as well as its legal mandates, the state board shall vote whether to approve the transaction.

For purposes of property disposals under this section, notice shall be published in four consecutive issues of a weekly paper of the county in which such land is situated, in such other papers as the state board of land commissioners may direct, and on the state board's public website. The state board shall directly notify, by e-mail if available, all lessees of the property and all governmental entities within whose boundaries the proposed transaction will take place. The notice shall identify the parcel, the local government or special district to receive the property interest, the purpose and benefit of the disposal, and the time and location of the public hearing.

The state board of land commissioners shall not complete more than two transactions pursuant to this section in a fiscal year. All disposals pursuant to this section shall:

Be based on fair market value as determined by the state board that is consistent with an independent appraisal conforming to the uniform standards of professional appraisal practice standards; and

Identify the purpose of the disposal of property as:

Adding value to adjoining or nearby state trust property;

Complying with valid local land use regulations as required by section 10 of article IX of the state constitution; or

Benefitting state board operations.

Repealed.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (HB 10-1165), ch. 124, p. 412, § 2, effective April 15.

L. 2015:

(5) amended, (HB 15-1212), ch. 174, p. 569, § 1, effective May 11.

L. 2021:

(5) repealed, (SB 21-266), ch. 423, p. 2805, § 33, effective July 2.

36-1-124.5. Nonsimultaneous exchanges of state trust lands - fund.

The state board of land commissioners shall have the authority to undertake nonsimultaneous exchanges of land. For the purposes of section 22-41-101 (2), C.R.S., proceeds of land sold or otherwise disposed as part of a nonsimultaneous transfer pursuant to this section are not part of the designated trust fund until the nonsimultaneous transfer is completed pursuant to subsection (4) of this section.

All revenues derived from the sale or other disposition of state trust land that is designated by the state board of land commissioners as being part of a nonsimultaneous exchange shall be transmitted by the director of the state board of land commissioners to the state treasurer who shall credit the same to a separate account in the nonsimultaneous state trust land exchange cash fund, which fund is hereby created. All interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund shall be credited to the appropriate account in the fund. Moneys held in the fund shall not be used for the operating expenses of the board or for expenses incident to the disposition or acquisition of lands. Moneys in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated to the state board of land commissioners for the purposes of this section.

Land that is designated by the state board of land commissioners to be purchased at the completion or partial completion of a designated nonsimultaneous exchange shall be paid for by moneys in the appropriate account in the fund.

Upon a determination by the state board of land commissioners that a nonsimultaneous exchange is completed, but in any event no later than two years after the sale or other disposition of land designated as part of a nonsimultaneous exchange, any moneys remaining in a designated account in the fund shall be credited by the state treasurer to the trust fund maintained by the state treasurer for the proceeds of the trust lands disposed of or sold.

Source:

L. 97:

Entire section added, p. 843, § 21, effective May 21.

36-1-125. Reservations of rights on sale.

All sales of state lands shall be held at the state capitol unless otherwise directed by the state board of land commissioners. The state board of land commissioners shall reserve to the state all rights to all minerals, ores, and metals of any kind and character, and all coal, asphaltum, oil, gas, or other like substances in or under such land, and all geothermal resources and the right of ingress and egress for the purpose of mining, together with enough of the surface of the same as may be necessary for the proper and convenient working of such minerals and substances.

All patents and certificates of purchase on state or school lands issued before March 31, 1919, and in which a reservation of rights to minerals, ores, and metals of any kind or character whatsoever, or coal, asphaltum, oil, gas, and other like substances, or geothermal resources has been made are validated. The holders of such certificates of purchase or the owners of said lands so patented shall by contract, deed, or other agreement acknowledge or reconvey to the state the minerals and substances so reserved, and the state board of land commissioners is authorized to accept on behalf of the state such deeds and conveyances and to make such agreements as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this article.

All patents and certificates of purchase issued before March 31, 1919, describing the lands with reference to legal subdivisions shown by the United States official survey, or by lots, blocks, or tracts shown on a recorded plat, or by metes and bounds descriptions, are validated.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 647, § 18.

C.L.

§ 1171.

CSA:

C. 134, § 70.

L. 49:

p. 554, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-26.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-26.

L. 74:

(1) amended, p. 314, § 5, effective May 17.

L. 77:

(1) amended, p. 1622, § 1, effective May 27.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 844, § 22, effective May 21.

Cross references:

For additional provisions concerning the sale of state lands, see article 5 of this title.

36-1-126. Delinquent payments.

When any purchaser of land defaults for a period of thirty days in any of the payments of either principal or interest due upon the certificate of purchase issued to him, the certificate may be forfeited and the lands reverted to the state upon a notice to that effect mailed to the last-known post-office address of the purchaser, which notice shall allow him thirty days additional in which to pay the indebtedness to the state.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 648, § 19.

C.L.

§ 1172.

CSA:

C. 134, § 71.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-27.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-27.

36-1-127. Forfeiture - new sale.

If any purchaser of state land, after receiving a certificate of purchase, fails to make any one of the payments stipulated therein, and the same remains unpaid for thirty days after the time when it should have been paid, as specified in the certificate, the state board of land commissioners, after issuing notice of forfeiture and allowing thirty days additional to pay the indebtedness as provided in section 36-1-126, may sell the land again. In the case of a sale, all previous payments made on account of such land shall be forfeited to the state. The land shall revert to the state and the title thereof shall be in the state as if no sale had ever been made.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 649, § 20.

C.L.

§ 1173.

CSA:

C. 134, § 72.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-28.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-28.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 845, § 23, effective May 21.

36-1-128. Place of payment - venue.

All moneys due and payable to the state board of land commissioners shall be paid at the office of the state board of land commissioners in the city and county of Denver, Colorado, and all actions for the recovery of same, or for the cancellation of certificates of purchase, or for the cancellation of leases, or for the recovery of the possession of the land, actions of forcible entry and detainer, or ejectment shall be brought in any court of competent jurisdiction in the city and county of Denver in the state of Colorado.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 649, § 21.

C.L.

§ 1174.

CSA:

C. 134, § 73.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-29.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-29.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 845, § 24, effective May 21.

36-1-129. Bonds.

When, in the judgment of the state board of land commissioners, a bond, a damage deposit, or earnest moneys by the purchaser of state lands is necessary, the board shall require the purchaser to give the financial warranty upon such conditions as the board may determine.

In leasing state lands for nonagricultural purposes, the state board of land commissioners shall require of the lessee a bond or damage deposit securing the state against loss of rents or other loss or waste, or occupation of the land for more than thirty days after the cancellation or expiration of the lease of the lessee, unless the lessee becomes the purchaser of the land, and the state board of land commissioners shall retain all interest earned on such a bond or damage deposit while held by the state board of land commissioners. In no case shall the lessee be allowed to cut or use more timber than is necessary for the improvement of the land or for fuel for the use of the family of the lessee; and the cutting and hauling of timber to sawmills, to be sawed on shares, is expressly prohibited.

A lessee of state lands shall not be required to post a bond if such lessee is leasing state lands solely for agricultural purposes; except that a bond or damage deposit may be required for state-owned improvements even if leased solely for agricultural purposes.

All bonds, damage deposits, and earnest moneys collected pursuant to this article that the state board of land commissioners has deemed forfeited or required for remediation activities shall be credited to the financial warranty account of the state land board trust administration fund created in section 36-1-145 (2)(e). Moneys in the account, including interest earned on the forfeited bonds, damage deposits, and earnest moneys deposited in the account, are continuously appropriated for the remediation or other activities on the affected property.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 649, § 22.

C.L.

§ 1175.

CSA:

C. 134, § 74.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-30.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-30.

L. 94:

Entire section amended, p. 1682, § 1, effective May 31.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (HB 10-1165), ch. 124, p. 412, § 3, effective April 15.

L. 2013:

(2)(a) and (3) amended, (HB 13-1274), ch. 376, p. 2214, § 4, effective June 5.

36-1-130. Lost certificate of purchase. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 19:

p. 650, § 23.

C.L.

§ 1176.

CSA:

C. 134, § 75.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-31.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-31.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 845, § 25, effective May 21.

36-1-131. State land board hearings - rules.

The state board of land commissioners may hear and determine the claims of all persons who claim a legal interest in the land or trust administered by the state board of land commissioners and who are aggrieved by an action of the board. The state board of land commissioners may appoint one or more of its members, the director, a hearing officer, or other appointee to render an initial decision on any matter before the board. Such decision may be appealed to the board. Any hearing or appeal shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of article 4 of title 24, C.R.S.

The board may promulgate such rules as in its opinion may be proper to accomplish any of its duties and powers.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 650, § 24.

C.L.

§ 1177.

CSA:

C. 134, § 76.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-32.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-32.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 845, § 26, effective May 21.

36-1-132. Lands sold subject to taxation.

All lands sold under the provisions of this article or any interest therein shall be subject to taxation, and the director of the state board of land commissioners shall furnish to the county assessor of each county on May 1 of each year a list of the equities owned or acquired in all lands so sold, to whom sold, the price per acre, and the amount paid. Each county shall pay the expense incurred in compiling such list.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 650, § 25.

C.L.

§ 1178.

CSA:

C. 134, § 77.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-33.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-33.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 846, § 27, effective May 21.

36-1-133. Rebate of taxes on reverted land.

In case any lands sold under the provisions of this article are reverted to the state for any cause whatsoever, the director of the state board of land commissioners shall at once notify the county treasurer of the county in which the land is situated, and upon receipt of such notice it is the duty of the county treasurer to at once rebate all taxes that have been charged against the lands so reverted.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 650, § 26.

C.L.

§ 1179.

CSA:

C. 134, § 78.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-34.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-34.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 846, § 28, effective May 21.

36-1-134. Proceeds of sale - funds.

The funds arising from the sale of public school, university, and agricultural college lands shall be held intact for the benefit of the funds for which such lands were granted and shall be known as permanent funds, and the interest and rentals only shall be expended for the purpose of the grant. The funds arising from the sale, leasing, and income of all other state lands shall be disposed of as provided by law but, in the absence of any other provisions, may be invested in the same manner as the school fund.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 650, § 27.

C.L.

§ 1180.

CSA:

C. 134, § 79.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-35.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-35.

36-1-135. Proceeds of leases - disposition.

All moneys arising from the leasing of agricultural college, university, or public school lands which, on or after March 31, 1919, are received by the state treasurer shall be treated in all respects in the same manner as is provided by law for the disposition of the interest on the proceeds arising from the sale of the same class of lands.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 651, § 28.

C.L.

§ 1181.

CSA:

C. 134, § 80.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-36.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-36.

36-1-136. Rights-of-way granted - reversion.

The state board of land commissioners may grant rights-of-way across or upon any portion of state land for any ditch, reservoir, railroad, communication system, electric power line, pipeline, or other installation necessary for the operation of said services or utilities and may grant rights-of-way on any tracts of state land to any person, public agency or instrumentality of the United States, or to this state, or to any of the institutions, agencies, counties, municipalities, districts, or other political subdivisions of this state for the purpose of building schoolhouses or public roads or highways or for any lawful use or purpose. Any right-of-way so granted shall be on such terms as the board shall determine and shall be subject to the filing fee specified in section 36-1-112. Said board may execute and sign, as provided by this article, on behalf of this state, an instrument in writing for such right-of-way or grant. This section shall not be construed to grant authority to said board to convey title to any such land by a grant of right-of-way. Whenever rights-of-way granted for any purposes mentioned in this section cease to be used for such purposes, the rights-of-way shall terminate, and all rights shall revert to this state or its successors in interest.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 651, § 29.

C.L.

§ 1182.

CSA:

C. 134, § 81.

L. 47:

p. 690, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-37.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-37.

L. 69:

p. 924, § 1.

L. 73:

p. 1140, § 1.

L. 77:

Entire section amended, p. 1620, § 2, effective May 26.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 846, § 29, effective May 21.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 828, § 50, effective August 5.

36-1-137. Sale of lands to procure irrigation.

Repealed.

If any person, other than the person making application for the purchase of the lands, is the highest bidder at the public sale thereof, such bidder shall, within such reasonable time as the board may fix, enter into a contract and bond, as required by the provisions of this article, for the construction of the ditch and for the furnishing of water therefrom; and, in the event of his failure to furnish a satisfactory bond and enter into the said contract within the time fixed, then such bid shall be disregarded, and such public sale shall be void and of no effect. The board shall make the sale upon like conditions as other state lands are sold, and shall require a good and sufficient bond from the party desiring to construct such ditch, conditioned upon the faithful performance of the contract, and the conditions of the sale, and in no case shall the title to any of said lands pass from the state until the ditch has been completed and accepted by the board.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 651, § 30.

C.L.

§ 1183.

CSA:

C. 134, § 82.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-38.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-38.

L. 97:

(1) and (2) repealed, p. 846, § 30, effective May 21.

36-1-138. Mineral section - personnel - duties.

The state board of land commissioners is authorized to establish, under the jurisdiction of the director of the state board of land commissioners, a mineral section and appoint a minerals director with experience in mineral resources production, management, development, or reclamation. It is the duty of the minerals director or such director's designee or contractor to inspect all works operated under leases from the state for the production of mineral resources upon which rentals are due to the state upon a basis of a royalty upon the production therefrom, as often from time to time as the minerals director shall deem it necessary for the purpose of estimating and checking royalties therefrom, and keep such maps or other information of the workings of all such operations as will give the minerals section full information concerning the same.

In the event the minerals director utilizes a contractor to conduct such investigation, the compensation to such contractor shall not be based on the number or amount of audit findings referred to the director for action.

Lessees of all mineral resources lands shall be required to furnish the minerals director with copies or blueprints of all maps of underground surveys of leased land, made or authorized by such lessee, including engineer's field notes, certified to by the engineer who made the survey. The minerals director or such director's designee or contractor shall review activities related to mineral resources leases. The minerals director shall also check the royalties reported as due under such lease for the preceding month and compare the same with the surveys and other inspections made by the minerals director and shall report the result of such examination and checking to the director of the state board of land commissioners. Every mine and oil and gas operation and other works upon the lands managed by the state board of land commissioners held under lease therefrom by any person, association, partnership, or corporation shall be at all times subject to the inspection of the minerals director or such director's designee or contractor. The minerals director or the director's designee or contractor shall inspect and examine all lands held under lease from the state, providing for the payment of royalties from the production therefrom, and report to the director of the state board of land commissioners the condition of said lands and the amount of work and development done thereon by such lessees and make such recommendations relative thereto as the minerals director may deem advisable. The minerals director or such director's designee or contractor shall upon ten days notice have access during normal business hours to records and books necessary to determine the royalty due from the production and disposition of all substances produced from state trust lands, which record or book is in the possession or under the control of the lessee or the lessee's assign. If after reasonable effort the minerals director or such director's designee or contractor is unable to obtain sufficient information from the lessee or assign to determine the royalty due, the director or designee or contractor may petition the state board of land commissioners for an order which upon notice and hearing shall grant access to information, records, and books pertaining to royalties that are in the possession or under the control of any entity that purchases, distributes, processes, or transports the substance produced from the state trust land. Except as is necessary to determine and report to the board royalties due to the board, all information acquired by the director or director's designee or contractor under this subsection (2) shall be protected as confidential information and shall not be a matter of public record in the absence of a written release from the entity from which the information was obtained or until otherwise ordered by a court.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 653, § 31.

C.L.

§ 1184.

CSA:

C. 134, § 83.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-39.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-39.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 847, § 31, effective May 21.

Cross references:

For inquiries by the director of the division of labor into relations existing between lessees of state lands and the state, see § 8-1-122.

36-1-139. Royalties on coal - ton defined. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 19:

p. 654, § 32.

L. 21:

p. 739, § 1.

C.L.

§ 1185.

L. 25:

p. 468, § 1.

CSA:

C. 134, § 84.

L. 53:

p. 454, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-40.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-40.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 848, § 32, effective May 21.

36-1-140. Mineral locations - posting - lease.

Location of mineral claims, other than claims for coal and oil shale, may be made upon unleased mineral lands belonging to the state. The discoverer of a body of mineral in either a lead, lode, ledge, deposit, vein, or contact shall immediately post conspicuously a notice declaring that he has made such a discovery on the date attached to the notice. Within ten days after posting said notice, the discoverer must notify the state board of land commissioners of said discovery and arrange for a permit to explore the extent of the discovery. Within sixty days from date of discovery, the locator shall be required to take a lease upon such terms as may be agreed upon by the state board of land commissioners or apply for an extension of the permit.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 655, § 33.

C.L.

§ 1186.

CSA:

C. 134, § 85.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-41.

L. 55:

p. 684, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-41.

L. 80:

Entire section amended, p. 694, § 1, effective April 13.

Cross references:

For lode claims, see article 43 of title 34.

36-1-141. Exchange of lands with government.

The state board of land commissioners is authorized to exchange any lands, the income from which is devoted to the public schools of the state, the state universities, the state agricultural college, penitentiary, internal improvements, or saline or any other lands which may be under the control of the state board of land commissioners and which may have been granted to the state by the congress of the United States, for such unappropriated federal lands in the state as the state board of land commissioners may select. The director of said board is empowered to sign all papers necessary to such transfer, under the direction of the board.

Source:

L. 19:

p. 655, § 34.

C.L.

§ 1187.

CSA:

C. 134, § 86.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-42.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-42.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 849, § 33, effective May 21.

36-1-142. Receipts from agricultural lands.

The state board of land commissioners is required to transmit or cause to be transmitted to the secretary of the board of governors of the Colorado state university system, as the same are received, statements showing each item of receipt of money from all leases or sales and royalties, or as interest on purchase money passing through its hands, derived from agricultural college land grant land, which statement shall name and describe the lands to which the money paid applies, from whom and for what received, and whether the item is credited to land income or permanent fund.

Source:

L. 15:

p. 389, § 1.

C.L.

§ 1188.

CSA:

C. 134, § 87.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-43.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-43.

L. 2002:

Entire section amended, p. 1248, § 25, effective August 7.

36-1-143. Statement to board of governors of the Colorado state university system.

On or before the second Wednesday in December of every year, the state board of land commissioners shall furnish to the board of governors of the Colorado state university system a complete statement of all transactions had by it in connection with agricultural college lands, which statement shall show:

Amounts received from sales of such lands, describing the lands sold and the price received for each tract and giving the name of the purchaser;

Amounts received from leases and royalties, describing the lands leased from which such income is derived and giving the name of the lessee or operator;

Amounts received as interest on purchase money and other items, giving the name of the payer;

Amounts due and unpaid on purchases and leases and other delinquencies, if any;

Such other items as will enable said board of governors of the Colorado state university system to keep informed as to the condition of said lands, the income therefrom, and the manner in which the same are being administered.

Source:

L. 15:

p. 389, § 2.

C.L.

§ 1189.

CSA:

C. 134, § 88.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-44.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-44.

L. 2002:

(1) amended, p. 1248, § 26, effective August 7.

36-1-144. Agreements with general agencies.

The state board of land commissioners is authorized to enter into cooperative agreements on behalf of the state with any federal agency for the improvement and betterment of state owned lands and to furnish necessary materials and tools in connection therewith.

Source:

L. 37:

p. 941, § 1.

CSA:

C. 134, § 88(1).

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-45.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-45.

36-1-145. Land commissioners' receipts - appropriation.

All moneys collected by the state board of land commissioners shall be deposited with the state treasurer. Moneys received by the state board of land commissioners for fees and services shall be credited by the state treasurer to the state board of land commissioners land and water management fund created in section 36-1-148. All other moneys deposited by the state board of land commissioners shall be credited by the state treasurer to the proper funds as provided by law.

The state land board trust administration fund is hereby created in the state treasury for the purposes specified in paragraph (b) of this subsection (2).

The general assembly shall annually appropriate moneys from the state land board trust administration fund sufficient to pay for the salaries of employees of the state board of land commissioners and expenses and per diem allowances of commissioners and all other expenses incurred in administering the provisions of articles 1 to 7 of this title and sections 9 and 10 of article IX of the Colorado constitution. Each land grant administered by the state board of land commissioners shall be charged with the expense of its administration.

Any moneys remaining in the state land board trust administration fund at the end of the state fiscal year shall be allocated to the trust funds under the control of the state board of land commissioners in an amount equal to the proportion of such moneys that would have been paid into such trust funds but for their allocation to the state land board trust administration fund; except that moneys in the financial warranty account of the fund created in paragraph (e) of this subsection (2) shall remain in the account until spent.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 97, p. 850, § 34, effective May 21, 1997.)

There is hereby created in the state land board trust administration fund the financial warranty account, consisting of financial warranties credited to the account pursuant to section

36-1-129 (3)

. The board shall expend moneys in the account only for purposes specified in section

36-1-129 (3)

.

The general assembly shall allocate moneys to the state land board trust administration fund from the income generated by the state trust lands. The allocations to the fund and the appropriations to the state board of land commissioners shall be sufficient to enable the state board of land commissioners to perform its duties.

Source:

L. 57:

pp. 592, 593, §§ 1, 2.

CRS 53:

§ 112-3-46.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-46.

L. 71:

p. 1096, § 1.

L. 79:

(1) amended, p. 1346, § 2, effective July 1.

L. 83:

(2) R&RE, p. 1380, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 85:

(2)(a) and (2)(d) amended, p. 1143, § 1, effective June 6.

L. 89:

(2)(c) and (2)(d) amended, p. 1415, § 1, effective April 6.

L. 92:

(1) amended, p. 1910, § 2, effective March 4.

L. 95:

(2)(a) and (2)(d) amended, p. 456, § 1, effective May 16.

L. 97:

Entire section amended, p. 850, § 34, effective May 21.

L. 2007:

(2)(b) amended, p. 2048, § 93, effective June 1.

L. 2010:

(2)(c) amended and (2)(e) added, (HB 10-1165), ch. 124, p. 413, § 4, effective April 15.

36-1-146. Acquisition of right-of-way. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 63:

p. 750, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 112-3-47.

L. 97:

Entire section repealed, p. 851, § 35, effective May 21.